California statutes. Streets and Highways Code
  CHAPTER 10. Estimating and Levying the Assessment [19180. - 19185.]

19180.

On or before the first day of September of each year, the governing body shall make an estimate of the cost, not otherwise offset by other available revenue, of conducting and maintaining the district for the ensuing fiscal year, and shall include therein the cost of installing and maintaining such additional lights as may have been petitioned for by the residents of the district as well as the cost of any other things which may be necessary or proper for carrying out the purposes of this part, including a levy of tax or assessment not to exceed 10 percent of the total levy for other purposes for the purpose of accumulating reserve for installation of additional lights which, in the opinion of the governing board, may be petitioned for before the proceeds of another tax or assessment levy will be available for use for such purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 261.)
-------------------------------------------

19180.1.

Whenever the board of supervisors levies an assessment authorized by Section 19180, the assessment shall be levied pursuant to Chapter 6.1 (commencing with Section 54701) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 487, Sec. 21.   Effective July 10, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

19181.

When the estimate has been made, the board of supervisors of the county shall, at the time of levying county taxes, levy a special tax upon all of the taxable property within the district at the equalized value thereof sufficient to raise the amount of the estimate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 487, Sec. 23.   Effective July 10, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

19182.

If a district is organized in any year too late for the levy of a tax or assessment in that year or in the next ensuing year, the board of supervisors is hereby authorized to transfer funds of the county not immediately needed for county purposes to the funds of the district to be used for the payment of the expenses of the district until such time as tax or assessment receipts are available therefor. The governing body may authorize the immediate installation of the lighting system in the district, and shall include in the levy of taxes or assessments for the district for the first fiscal year in which a tax or assessment may be levied, a sum sufficient to repay to the county the amounts so transferred to the district for the portion or portions of the preceding fiscal year or years for which no levy of taxes or assessments was made for that purpose, and the amounts shall be retransferred to the county treasury out of the first available receipts from the tax or assessment levy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 261.)
-------------------------------------------

19183.

If any lights have been maintained by public subscription or by money supplied from the district road funds, within any territory which subsequently becomes a lighting district organized under this part, at the time of the establishment of such lighting district, or at the time of expiration of any then existing contract for the maintenance of such lights; such lights and the future cost of maintaining and operating them shall be included in the estimate of the governing body and shall thenceforth be maintained as a part of the lighting system of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

19184.

The special tax shall be levied, computed, entered, collected, and enforced at the same time, in the same manner, by the same persons and with the same penalties and priority of lien as other taxes for county purposes and when collected shall be paid into the county treasury to the credit of the fund of the district and shall be used only for the payment of the expenses of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 487, Sec. 24.   Effective July 10, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

19185.

Pursuant to a resolution adopted by the board of supervisors, a county may lend any available county funds to a district for the replacement of obsolete lighting system equipment. Any such loan may be restricted for use in a temporary zone in a district. The loan shall bear interest at a rate to be fixed by the board of supervisors and shall be repaid in approximately equal installments over a period not to exceed 10 years. Any funds lent to the district are appropriated for the purposes for which the loan was made. Any area of a district, or of a temporary zone in a district, which is included in a city by annexation or incorporation after a loan has been made shall continue to be taxed or assessed for the repayment of its proportionate part of the unpaid balance of the loan.

If a zone is formed, the board of supervisors shall, in the first fiscal year in which a special tax or assessment may be levied in the zone, and in each succeeding year of the duration of the zone, levy a special tax upon the taxable property or assessment in the zone for the purpose of repaying the amount lent to the district by the county. When the loan has been repaid, the zone shall terminate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 261.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 10.5. Claims [19190. - 19190.]

19190.

All claims for money or damages against the district are governed by Part 3 (commencing with Section 900) and Part 4 (commencing with Section 940) of Division 3.6 of Title 1 of the Government Code except as provided therein, or by other statutes or regulations expressly applicable thereto.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1715.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 11. Disposition of Funds [19200. - 19202.]

19200.

The revenue derived from the special tax, together with all other moneys acquired by the district, shall be paid into the county treasury to the credit of the lighting fund of the district subject only to the order of the governing body and shall be expended by it only for and on behalf of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

19201.

Any funds arising from assessments made under this part remaining in the county treasury after the payment of all outstanding legal obligations incurred by the district, shall be ordered transferred by the governing body to the city treasurer of any city that has been incorporated since the formation of the district, and which includes the district or a considerable portion thereof within its corporate limits. If no such city has been incorporated then the funds so remaining in the county treasury shall be transferred to a separate fund and upon the order of the governing body shall be repaid pro rata to the persons by whom the assessments were originally paid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

19202.

The governing body of any highway lighting district may provide for the establishment of an accumulative capital outlay fund for the replacement of obsolete lighting system equipment. The fund shall be kept in reserve until appropriated in whole or in part to a specific project.

At any time after the creation of the fund the governing body may transfer to it any unencumbered surplus funds remaining on hand at the end of the fiscal year after the payment of the expenses of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1963, Ch. 854.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 12. Annexation of Territory [19210. - 19215.]

19210.

Territory in the same county whether contiguous or not may be annexed to a highway lighting district. A petition for that purpose may be filed with the board of supervisors of the county in which the district is situated. The petition shall:

(a) Designate the boundaries of the territory proposed to be annexed to the district.

(b) Designate the number of owners of real property in such territory and the assessed value of the real property in the territory as shown by the last equalized assessment roll of the county.

(c) State that the territory proposed to be annexed is not within the limits of any other lighting district, and request that such territory be annexed to the lighting district.

(d) Be signed by the owners representing at least one-fourth of the total assessed valuation of the real property proposed to be annexed to the district, as shown by the last equalized assessment roll of the county, and by at least one-fourth of the total number of owners of real property in such territory.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 758.)
-------------------------------------------

19211.

At the first regular meeting after the petition has been filed with it, the board of supervisors shall fix a time for hearing the petition and the protests of interested parties, and shall cause a notice of the filing of the petition and the time set for the hearing to be published pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code and not less than one week prior to that time in a newspaper published and circulated in the county in which the district is situated. If there is no such newspaper, copies of the notice shall be posted in three conspicuous places in the territory to be annexed, for three weeks prior to the date fixed for hearing the petition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1967, Ch. 173.)
-------------------------------------------

19212.

Upon the date fixed for the hearing, or at any time to which it is continued, the board of supervisors shall consider the petition, and any objections which may be filed against it or against the annexation of any territory to the district.

The board of supervisors may by order entered on its minutes grant the petition either in whole or in part, and by order entered on its minutes alter the boundaries of the district, and annex thereto all or such portion of the contiguous territory described in the petition as will be benefited by inclusion in the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

19213.

Any territory which will not be benefited, by inclusion in the district, or which is not contiguous to the district, or which is not described in the petition, shall not be included in the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

19214.

The order of annexation shall be conclusive evidence of the validity of all prior proceedings leading to the annexation recited therein and after the making of the order, the territory shall become a part of the lighting district and shall be taxed, together with the remainder of the district, for all taxes thereafter levied by the board of supervisors for the maintenance of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

19215.

If a petition, signed by 15 or more taxpayers and residents of the area sought to be annexed, but less than the number of owners representing one-fourth of the amount of assessed value of real property in that area and less than the number of owners specified in subdivision (d) of Section 19210 of this chapter, is presented to the board of supervisors, the board, if the petition for such annexation expressly requests them so to do, shall order an election within the territory sought to be annexed.

The election shall be ordered by the board of supervisors at a hearing, after establishing the boundaries. To the extent applicable, the election shall be called and conducted in the same manner as an election for formation.

If a majority of votes cast are in favor of the proposition of annexing the territory to the district, such territory shall become a part of the highway lighting district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1951, Ch. 1278.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 13. Withdrawal of Territory [19230. - 19234.]

19230.

Any portion of the territory of a highway lighting district may be withdrawn therefrom. Proceedings for the withdrawal of territory may be instituted by the board of supervisors upon its own motion, or by filing with the board of supervisors a petition signed by 50 or more freeholders or by a majority thereof if there are less than 100, within the territory desired to be withdrawn from the district requesting the withdrawal of the territory and describing the exterior boundaries of the territory so sought to be withdrawn.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 261.)
-------------------------------------------

19231.

The board of supervisors shall fix a time and place for the hearing on the motion or the petition and for hearing protests against the continuance of the remaining territory as a highway lighting district. The time fixed for the hearings shall not be less than 15 nor more than 30 days after the motion or receipt of the petition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 261.)
-------------------------------------------

19232.

At least 10 days before the time fixed for the hearing the board of supervisors shall publish a notice of the hearing by one insertion in the newspaper circulated in the district which the board believes will best serve to give notice to the inhabitants of the district of the proposed withdrawal of territory. The notice shall also be posted at least one week prior to the time fixed for the hearing in three public places within the district, one of which shall be within the portion of the district proposed to be withdrawn.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

19233.

Any person interested may appear at the hearing and object to the withdrawal of territory from the district or may object to the continuance of the remaining territory as a highway lighting district. The board of supervisors shall consider and pass upon all objections, and the board of supervisors may order the withdrawal or may grant the petition for withdrawal either in whole or in part, and by resolution declare the district reestablished excluding from the district the territory withdrawn if it finds that one or more of the following facts exist:

(a) The territory to be withdrawn will be benefited by withdrawal.

(b) The withdrawal will allow economies and efficiencies in administration or operation of an existing lighting system in the territory to be withdrawn.

The decision of the board of supervisors on all objections and protests which are made shall be final and conclusive.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 261.)
-------------------------------------------

19234.

Upon the withdrawal of any territory from the district, the remaining territory in the district shall continue as a lighting district until dissolved. No withdrawal of territory shall become effective until any outstanding contract for service has expired or such contract has, with the consent of the person furnishing such service, been modified or canceled so as to relieve the district of further obligation to pay for future lighting service within the territory withdrawn.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 14. Dissolution by Petition [19250. - 19253.]

19250.

Proceedings for the dissolution of the district may be instituted by filing with the board of supervisors a petition signed by 50 or more property owners and residents of the district, asking for its dissolution. The board of supervisors shall, within 30 days after receiving the petition, by resolution, order that an election be held in the district for the determination of the question of dissolution. The election shall be called and conducted in the same manner as other elections of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1951, Ch. 757.)
-------------------------------------------

19251.

If a majority of the votes cast at the election held in the district for determination of the question of dissolution are in favor of dissolution, the district shall be dissolved.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 468.)
-------------------------------------------

19252.

Upon the dissolution of the district the title to any property which it may have acquired shall vest in any city which has at that time a considerable portion of the territory of the lighting district within its boundaries. If there is no such city, the title to the property shall vest in the board of supervisors of the county wherein the district is situated until such a city is created.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

19253.

If at the time of the election to dissolve the district there is any indebtedness of the district outstanding, the vote to dissolve shall dissolve the district for all purposes except the levy and collection of taxes or assessments, as the case may be, for the payment of such outstanding indebtedness. From the time the district is thus dissolved until the indebtedness is fully paid, the legislative body of the city which is entitled to the property of the district as provided for in Section 19252 or, if there is no such city, the board of supervisors of the county wherein the district is located shall be the ex officio governing body of the district. That body shall levy such taxes or assessments and perform such other acts as may be necessary to pay the outstanding indebtedness of the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 261.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 15. Dissolution by Annexation or Incorporation Proceedings [19270. - 19274.]

19270.

Upon the inclusion of all of the territory embraced in any highway lighting district within one or more incorporated cities, either by annexation proceedings or by the incorporation of the cities, the district may be dissolved. Such dissolution shall be effective upon the filing with the State Board of Equalization, the governing body of the district, and the county assessor of a copy of a resolution of the legislative body of the city, or of a joint resolution of the legislative bodies of all the cities, declaring the district dissolved. The remaining unencumbered funds of the district shall be distributed and administered as provided in this chapter. No tax or assessment shall be levied after dissolution.

Any one city may withdraw its territory from the district in the manner provided by Section 19290.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 261.)
-------------------------------------------

19271.

If all of the territory of the district is included within one incorporated city, the money paid into the lighting fund shall be paid to the treasurer of that city, and administered by the legislative body thereof. The city legislative body shall have all of the powers and perform all of the duties granted to or imposed upon the board of supervisors of the county in which the district is located and shall carry out the provisions of this part as to such district to the same purpose and extent as if originally constituted the governing body thereof. The city shall be liable for all outstanding liabilities of the district incurred prior to the time the district was included within the city.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

19272.

If all of the territory of the district is included within more than one incorporated city, then such proportionate part of the money paid into the lighting fund shall be paid to the treasurer of each such city as the area of that portion of the district included in that city bears to the total area of the district. The funds so paid shall be administered by the legislative body of each such city, and each of the said legislative bodies shall have all the powers and perform all of the duties, so far as that portion of the district within its boundaries is concerned, granted to or imposed upon the board of supervisors of the county in which the district is located and shall carry out this part as to the portion of the district included within its boundaries to the same purpose and extent as if orginally constituted the governing body thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

19273.

Each city shall be liable for such proportionate part of all the outstanding liabilities of the district incurred prior to its inclusion within the cities as the area of that portion of the district included in each city bears to the total area of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------

19274.

After all of its territory has been included in one or more cities, and the district has been dissolved, upon the expenditure of its funds and the discharge of the district’s obligations by the city or cities, the powers and duties of the city or cities set forth in Sections 19271, 19272, and 19273 shall terminate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 413.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 15.5. Dissolution Upon Annexation to Maintenance District or Establishment of a County Service Area, a Community Services District, or a City [19280. - 19282.]

19280.

(a) A district organized under this part may be dissolved by resolution of the board of supervisors if all of the territory in the district has been annexed to a maintenance district for street lighting organized pursuant to Chapter 26 (commencing with Section 5820), Part 3, Division 7 and which shall provide service to the area and shall assume all of the assets and liabilities of the dissolved district.

Subsequent to annexation into a maintenance district for street lighting, and the dissolution of the highway lighting district formed pursuant to this part, all of the property tax revenues that would have accrued to the highway lighting district formed pursuant to this part, if it had remained a highway lighting district, shall accrue to the annexing maintenance district.

(b) A district organized under this part may be dissolved by a resolution of the board of supervisors, after a public hearing, where a county service area has been established to provide service to all the territory in the district and will assume all the assets and liabilities of the dissolved district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 207, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

19280.5.

A district organized under this part may be dissolved by a resolution of the board of supervisors, after a public hearing, where a community services district has been established, or a city has been formed, to provide service to all or part of the territory of the district and the community services district or the city, as the case may be, has elected to assume all the assets and liabilities of the dissolved district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 166, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

19281.

If the board of supervisors finds that all of the facts set forth in Section 19280 exist, the board may dissolve the district by adopting a resolution which sets forth such facts. In the resolution, the board may fix a date upon which the dissolution shall become effective.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 295.)
-------------------------------------------

19282.

The dissolution shall be effective upon the filing with the State Board of Equalization and the county assessor of a copy of the resolution of the board of supervisors declaring the district dissolved, or on such later date as may be fixed by the board of supervisors in such resolution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 295.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 16. Miscellaneous Provisions [19290. - 19291.]

19290.

Whenever any portion of a district is included within a city by reason of incorporation, annexation, or otherwise, such portion may be withdrawn from the district. Such withdrawal shall be effective upon the filing with the State Board of Equalization, the governing body of the district, and the county assessor, of copies of a resolution of the legislative body of the city, describing the included portion, and declaring such portion withdrawn. Upon the withdrawal of any territory of a district, all property acquired for the district and all unencumbered funds on the date of withdrawal, including all taxes levied and collected by the district in any year in which taxes are levied and collected by the district after the date of withdrawal on property withdrawn from the district, shall be divided between the city and the remaining district in proportion to the assessed value of the real property of the territory so withdrawn and the portion remaining. For the purpose of this article, the unencumbered funds are the sum of money, uncollected taxes, and other uncollected accounts belonging to or due such district, in excess of an amount sufficient to pay all claims and accounts against the district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1562.)
-------------------------------------------

19291.

If a portion of the territory embraced in any district has been detached therefrom prior to the twenty-ninth day of July, 1927, either by annexation or incorporation proceedings, and the portion of the territory of such district remaining unannexed or unincorporated has been dissolved instead of continuing its existence as a lighting district, and thereafter moneys are paid into the fund of such district by reason of the collection of delinquent taxes or otherwise, such portion of the subsequent fund accretions, as was provided by law at the time of such annexation or incorporation, shall be paid to the city or cities within which the detached portion of such district was included. The remainder of such moneys shall be paid into the road fund of the road district within which the remaining unannexed or unincorporated portion of such district lay.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 79.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 17. Temporary Zones [19300. - 19314.]

19300.

A petition asking for the installation and maintenance of additional lights pursuant to Chapter 9 of this part may request the board of supervisors to establish a temporary zone consisting solely of contiguous territory within the district which will be benefited by said additional lights, for the purpose of levying a special tax therein to finance the cost of installation and temporary maintenance thereof. In such case, the petition shall contain:

(a) A general description of the nature of the proposed additional lights, together with a map showing the location thereof.

(b) An estimate of all costs or charges which will be incurred in connection with the installation thereof, together with a statement as to the period of time, not to exceed three years, proposed for the payment of said costs or charges. 

(c) An estimate of the average monthly cost of maintenance of said lights.

(d) A description of the boundaries of the proposed temporary zone.

A proposal to form a temporary zone pursuant to this section shall be subject to the provisions of Chapter 3 of Title 6 of the Government Code to the same extent as a proposal to form a district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1704.)
-------------------------------------------

19301.

A petition for annexation filed pursuant to Chapter 12 of this part may, in addition to other matters required by that chapter, request that if the territory therein described, or any part thereof, is annexed to the district, the board of supervisors shall establish said annexed territory as a temporary zone for the purpose of levying a special tax therein to finance the cost of installation and temporary maintenance of the lights proposed to be installed in said annexed territory. In such case, the petition shall also contain:

(a) A general description of the nature of the lights proposed to be installed, together with a map showing the location thereof.

(b) An estimate of all costs or charges which will be incurred in connection with the installation thereof, together with a statement as to the period of time, not to exceed three years, proposed for the payment of said costs or charges. 

(c) An estimate of the average monthly cost of maintenance of said lights.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1704.)
-------------------------------------------

19302.

Upon the presentation of a petition pursuant to this chapter, the clerk of the board of supervisors shall immediately refer the same to an appropriate county officer, who shall certify to the board the number of owners of taxable property within the boundaries of the proposed zone whose names appear on said petition, together with the percentage of the total assessed valuation of all taxable property within the boundaries of the proposed zone, which said signatures represent.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1704.)
-------------------------------------------

19303.

If the certifying officer certifies that the petition bears the signatures of the owners of taxable property within the proposed zone representing 60 percent or more of the total assessed value of all taxable property in the zone, the petition shall be filed, and the board of supervisors shall fix a time for hearing the petition and the protests of interested parties, and shall cause a notice of the filing of the petition and the time set for the hearing to be published pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code in a newspaper designated by the board as most likely to give notice to the inhabitants of the district and the proposed zone. If there is no such newspaper, copies of the notice shall be posted in three conspicuous places in the proposed zone to be annexed, for three weeks prior to the date fixed for hearing the petition. The notice shall contain the text of the petition, but the names of the signers of the petition need not be published. Notice given pursuant to this section is a sufficient compliance with Section 19211.

If the certifying officer’s certificate shows that the petition does not bear the required number of signatures, the request for the formation of a temporary zone shall be denied, without prejudice to the filing of a new petition therefor, and the board of supervisors shall proceed to consider and act upon the petition as a petition filed pursuant to Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 19160) or Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 19210), as the case may be.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 106, Sec. 156.)
-------------------------------------------

19304.

Upon the date fixed for the hearing, or at any time to which it is continued, the board of supervisors shall, in addition to any other proceedings required by law, consider the request for formation of a temporary zone and any objections which may be filed against it or against the formation of the proposed zone.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1704.)
-------------------------------------------

19305.

If the board of supervisors determines, with respect to a petition for additional lights filed in conformity with this chapter, that(a) It is just and equitable, and in the public interest, that the proposed temporary zone be formed, and(b) The petition was signed by resident taxpayers representing 60 percent or more of the total assessed valuation of all taxable property within the territory proposed to be formed into a zone,the board shall by resolution, entered in its minutes, fix and describe the boundaries of the proposed zone in such manner that any territory which will not be benefited by inclusion therein, or which is not contiguous thereto, or which is not described in the petition, shall not be included therein; shall declare the zone established, designating it by an identifying name or number; and shall specify the purposes and duration thereof, not to exceed three years from the beginning of the next ensuing fiscal year in which a special tax levy or assessment may be made in the zone.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 261.)
-------------------------------------------

19306.

If the board of supervisors determines, with respect to a petition for annexation filed in conformity with this chapter, that(a) The petition for annexation should be granted in whole or in part, pursuant to Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 19210), and(b) It is just and equitable, and in the public interest, that the proposed temporary zone be formed, and(c) That the petition was signed by resident taxpayers representing 60 percent or more of the total assessed valuation of all taxable property within the area therein proposed to be annexed,the board, in addition to those proceedings required by Chapter 12, shall by resolution entered in its minutes, declare the annexed territory established as a temporary zone with boundaries coterminous with the boundaries of the territory annexed, designating the zone by an identifying name or number; and shall specify the purposes and duration thereof, not to exceed three years from the beginning of the next ensuing fiscal year in which a special tax or assessment levy may be made therein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 261.)
-------------------------------------------

19307.

The provisions of Sections 19036 and 19037 apply to proceedings under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1704.)
-------------------------------------------

19308.

A statement regarding the boundaries of a zone established pursuant to this chapter shall be filed as provided by Chapter 8, Part 1, Division 2, Title 5 of the Government Code, together with a statement as to the period of duration of said zone specified in the resolution establishing it.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1704.)
-------------------------------------------

19309.

In order that the lights proposed to be installed and maintained in a zone may be installed therein immediately after its formation, the governing body may authorize the immediate installation of the proposed lights in said zone, and may contract to pay any costs or charges incurred by reason of such installation in equal periodic payments over a period not to exceed the period of duration of said zone specified in the resolution establishing it.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 1704.)
-------------------------------------------

19310.

The board of supervisors may, from time to time, transfer moneys to the district, for the benefit of the zone, from any available funds of the county. Any moneys so transferred shall bear interest at a rate to be fixed by the board of supervisors and are hereby appropriated, and shall be used, for the payment of any currently payable expenses incurred by reason of the installation of the lights proposed for the zone, and for the cost of maintenance thereof prior to December 1st of the first fiscal year in which a special tax or assessment may be levied in and on behalf of the zone. All costs of maintenance of the lights, subsequent to that date, shall be budgeted and included in the general levy of taxes or assessments, as the case may be, in and on behalf of the district as a whole.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 261.)
-------------------------------------------

19310.5.

Any area of the district, or of a zone in the district, which is included in a city by annexation or incorporation after a loan has been made shall continue to be taxed or assessed for the repayment of its proportionate share of the unpaid balance of the loan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 261.)
-------------------------------------------

19311.

The board of supervisors shall, in the first fiscal year in which a special tax or assessment, as the case may be, may be levied in and on behalf of the zone, levy a special tax or assessment upon the taxable property therein for the purposes of the zone, and shall include in the levy a sum sufficient to repay to the county the amounts transferred to the district pursuant to Section 19310. The amounts so transferred shall be retransferred to the county treasury from the first available receipts from the special levy in the zone.

Thereafter, in the succeeding fiscal year or years during which the temporary zone remains in existence, the board of supervisors shall levy a special tax or assessment therein sufficient to pay any additional costs or charges incurred by reason of the installation of the lights therein, which may by contract be made payable in such year or years.

All special taxes or assessments levied in and on behalf of a zone, pursuant to this section, are in addition to any taxes or assessments levied therein for and on behalf of the district as a whole.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 261.)
-------------------------------------------

19311.1.

(a) The board of supervisors shall not levy assessments pursuant to Section 19311 unless it has adopted an ordinance to do so. The board of supervisors shall place before the voters of the zone, either before the initial ordinance takes effect or within one year thereafter, the question whether the district shall be authorized to levy assessments.

If the majority of those voting disapprove of such authority, no subsequent ordinance levying assessments for any succeeding fiscal year shall be adopted by the board of supervisors without the prior approval of the voters of the zone.

Subsequent election or elections to secure such approval shall not be held more than once a year.

(b) The approval of the voters may be secured at a district or countywide election, or by a ballot mailed to each property owner or registered voter of the zone.

(c) The proposition is approved if a majority of those voting approve the proposition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 261.)
-------------------------------------------

19312.

A zone shall remain in existence for the period of time specified in the resolution of the board of supervisors which established it, and shall thereafter automatically terminate; provided, there are then no outstanding obligations payable from special taxes or assessments to be levied in the zone.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 261.)
-------------------------------------------

19313.

Where the board of supervisors or legislative body has so declared in its resolution of intention to order the formation of a lighting district or any annexation thereto, the board of supervisors or legislative body may, in its resolution ordering the formation of a lighting district or any annexation thereto, order the district divided into tax assessment zones. Tax assessment zones may be formed at a time other than at the formation of the district or any annexation thereto if pursuant to the same procedure of resolution, notice, and hearing as are applicable under this chapter to the annexation of territory.

No district shall be divided into zones unless the board of supervisors or legislative body finds that a tax assessment zone requires special services or special facilities in addition to those provided generally by the lighting district or the replacement of obsolete equipment, and that the tax levy is commensurate with the special benefits to be provided in the zone. The boundaries of tax assessment zones may be changed or a zone may be dissolved in the same manner that a zone may be formed in an existing district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 157.)
-------------------------------------------

19314.

If a highway lighting district is divided into tax assessment zones, the board of supervisors or legislative body may determine what portion of the amount of money to be secured from the levy of taxes shall be secured from such zone within the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 157.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 18. Consolidation [19320. - 19328.]

19320.
